Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2405.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The sum of $2,235,000 $2,375,000 is hereby appropriated from the restricted revenue account within the General Fund to the Office of Small Business Advocate in the Department of Community and Economic Development to provide for the operation of that office for the fiscal year July 1, 2026, to June 30, 2027.Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or immediately, whichever is later.<--12345678910111213